src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"d:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
d:0 <=>
     Vow: (ʼ:) (Cns:+)  _ (%^Pen: %^VowsRM:|%^VOWRaise:) (%^PreI: %^StodRM:|%^VowsLI1:|%^StodRM:) [%^D2ZERO:0|%^ConsRM:] ;  !!= @CODE@ 
      Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: ) d _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:]  ;
    d _ %{õØ%}: [l:|ļ:|r:|n:] Vow: %^Pen: %^ConsRM: ;
    
"p:0"
!! **P loss before subsequent morpheme with underlying**  
p:0 <=>
    # Cns* Vow:+  p _ (Vow:) %^CC2C:  ;
    p _ %{õØ%}: [l:|ļ:|r:|n:] Vow: %^Pen: %^ConsRM: ;

"t:0"
!! **T loss before subsequent morpheme with underlying initial d**  
t:0 <=>
    # Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) t _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:]  ;
    Vow:+ ( ʼ: ) (Cns:) _ %^ConsRM: ;!2024-06-02
    [ Cns:+ | Vow: :u ] _ Vow: ( %^Stress1to2:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> d: õ d ;
    t _ %{õØ%}: [l:|ļ:|r:|n:] Vow: %^Pen: %^ConsRM: ;
!!€# kittõ%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>dõd
!!€0 kit00000tõd

"k:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
k:0 <=> s _ Vow: ( %^ConsSh:0 ) %^ConsRM:0 (%^VowsRM:0) ;
       # Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) k _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) [%^ConsSh:0|%^CC2C:]  ;
        s _ %{õØ%}: [l|ļ|r|n] Vow: %^Pen: %^ConsRM: ;
       
!!€# rikkā%^ConsSh%^Vow2Iin2di
!!€0 rik0ī00di

"š:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
š:0 <=> 
       # Cns* Vow š _ Vow: %^CC2C:  ;

"ț:0"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ț:0 <=> Cns _ (Vow:)  (%^VowsRM:0)  [%^ConsRM:0|%^CC2C:] ;


"s:š palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
s:š <=> _ (k) (%^U2ZERO:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 [ # | %> ] ;
       _ (t|k) Vow: Dummy:*  %^PalatalizeLeft:0   ;
!!€# liestā%^VV2V%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>i
!!€0 l0ešt00000i
        # Cns* ȯ:  : i: _ Cns:* (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# pȯ0is%^VowsLI1õd
!!€0 pūo0š0õd

"ǟ:ē palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ǟ:ē <=> _ (ʼ:) (Cns:+) %^VOWRaise: (%^PalatalizeLeft:0) (%^StodRM:) ;
! _ (ʼ:) (Cns:+) %^VOWRaise: (%^PalatalizeLeft:0) (%^StodRM:) [ # | %> ] ;
! 

"ǟ:e short and palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ǟ:e <=> # Cns* _ (ʼ:) Cns:+ ( Vow: ) %^VV2V: %^VOWRaise: ;
# Cns* _ ʼ: %^VV2V: %^VOWRaise: ;
!!€ kǟnga^VV2V^VOWRaise^VowsRMi
!!€ keņg0000i
!!€ nǟʼ^VV2V^VOWRaise^StodRM>i>z
!!€ ne000>i>z

"ä:e short and palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ä:e <=> # Cns* _ (ʼ:) Cns:+  %^VOWRaise: ;

"ǭ:ä palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
ǭ:ä <=> # Cns*  _ (ʼ: ) [p:|m:] Cns:* %^VV2V: %^PalatalizeLeft:0  ;

"a:ä palatalization"
!! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
a:ä <=> # Cns*  _ ( : | ʼ: ) [p:|m:] Cns* [%^PalatalizeLeft:0 | Vow: %^PalatalizeLeft:0 (%^ConsSh:) %^VowsRM: ] [ # | %> ] ;

!!€# aʼmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ḑi
!!€# äʼm00000ḑi

!echo 'a ʼ b # s õ ʼ:0 n ^StodRM:0 ā' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
